Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1014.
do enact as follows:AB1014,11Section 1. 14.898 of the statutes is created to read:AB1014,3,7214.898 Interstate massage compact. There is created an interstate 3massage compact commission as specified in s. 460.50. The delegate on the 4commission representing this state shall be appointed by the massage therapy and 5bodywork therapy affiliated credentialing board as provided in s. 460.50 (8) (b) 1. 6and shall be an individual described in s. 460.50 (8) (b) 2. The commission has the 7powers and duties granted and imposed under s. 460.50.AB1014,28Section 2. 111.335 (4) (jo) of the statutes is created to read:AB1014,3,119111.335 (4) (jo) Notwithstanding s. 111.322, it is not employment 10discrimination because of conviction record for the massage therapy and bodywork 11therapy affiliated credentialing board to do any of the following:AB1014,3,12121. Refuse to license an individual in accordance with s. 460.05 (1m) (a) 8.AB1014,4,212. Refuse to grant to an individual a multistate license, as defined in s. 460.01 2(5), in accordance with s. 460.50 (4) (a) 5. to 7.AB1014,33Section 3. 146.81 (1) (hp) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1014,4,64146.81 (1) (hp) A massage therapist or bodywork therapist who is licensed 5under subch. I of ch. 460 or who is exercising an authorization to practice, as 6defined in s. 460.01 (2), in this state.AB1014,47Section 4. 146.997 (1) (d) 13. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1014,4,108146.997 (1) (d) 13. A massage therapist or bodywork therapist who is licensed 9under ch. 460 or who is exercising an authorization to practice, as defined in s. 10460.01 (2), in this state.AB1014,511Section 5. 440.03 (11m) (c) 2wm. of the statutes is created to read:AB1014,4,1412440.03 (11m) (c) 2wm. The coordinated database and reporting system under 13s. 460.50 (9), if such disclosure is required under the interstate massage compact 14under s. 460.50.AB1014,615Section 6. 440.03 (13) (b) (intro.) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 16Wisconsin Act 20, is amended to read:AB1014,5,217440.03 (13) (b) (intro.) The department may investigate whether an applicant 18for or holder of any of the following credentials has been charged with or convicted 19of a crime only pursuant to rules promulgated by the department under this 20paragraph, including rules that establish the criteria that the department will use 21to determine whether an investigation under this paragraph is necessary, except as 22provided in par. (c) and ss. 441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 23448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 5. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 448.9887 (3) 1(b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 455.50 (3) (e) 4. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., and 2459.70 (3) (b) 2., and 460.50 (3) (a) 5.:AB1014,73Section 7. 440.03 (13) (c) 1. m. of the statutes is created to read:AB1014,5,54440.03 (13) (c) 1. m. An applicant for a multistate license under s. 460.05 5(3m).AB1014,86Section 8. 440.03 (13) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1014,5,117440.03 (13) (c) 2. The department of justice may submit the fingerprint cards, 8and the department of justice shall submit the fingerprint cards of all applicants 9identified in subd. 1. c. to L. m., to the federal bureau of investigation for the 10purpose of verifying the identity of the persons fingerprinted and obtaining records 11of their criminal arrests and convictions.AB1014,912Section 9. 440.15 of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 20, is 13amended to read:AB1014,5,2114440.15 No fingerprinting. Except as provided under ss. 440.03 (13) (c), 15441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 165. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 448.9887 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 450.071 (3) 17(c) 9., 450.075 (3) (c) 9., 455.50 (3) (e) 4. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., 18and 459.70 (3) (b) 1., and 460.50 (3) (a) 5., the department or a credentialing board 19may not require that an applicant for a credential or a credential holder be 20fingerprinted or submit fingerprints in connection with the department’s or the 21credentialing board’s credentialing.AB1014,1022Section 10. 446.01 (1v) (o) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1014,6,223446.01 (1v) (o) The massage therapy and bodywork therapy affiliated 24credentialing board under ch. 460. “Health care professional” also includes an 1individual who is exercising an authorization to practice, as defined in s. 460.01 (2), 2in this state.AB1014,113Section 11. Subchapter I (title) of chapter 460 [precedes 460.01] of the 4statutes is created to read:AB1014,6,55CHAPTER 460AB1014,6,66SUBCHAPTER IAB1014,6,87REGULATION OF MASSAGE THERAPY8AND BODYWORK THERAPYAB1014,129Section 12. 460.01 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1014,6,1010460.01 Definitions. (intro.) In this chapter subchapter:AB1014,1311Section 13. 460.01 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB1014,6,1412460.01 (2) “Authorization to practice” means the authorization to practice, as 13defined in s. 460.50 (2) (d), of an individual to practice in this state under a 14multistate license granted by another state that is a party to the compact.AB1014,1415Section 14. 460.01 (2k) of the statutes is created to read:AB1014,6,1716460.01 (2k) “Compact” means the interstate massage compact under s. 17460.50.AB1014,1518Section 15. 460.01 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1014,6,2219460.01 (2m) “License holder” means a person granted who holds a single-20state license granted under this chapter or who is exercising an authorization to 21practice under a multistate license granted in another state that is a party to the 22compact.AB1014,1623Section 16. 460.01 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB1014,7,11460.01 (5) “Multistate license” has the meaning given in s. 460.50 (2) (t).AB1014,172Section 17. 460.01 (8) of the statutes is created to read:AB1014,7,53460.01 (8) “Single-state license” means a single-state license, as defined in s. 4460.50 (2) (x), granted by the affiliated credentialing board under s. 460.05 (1m) or 5(2m). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1014 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1014 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1014 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1014 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1014: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting